South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Deer tags SECTION 1.    Section 50-9-650(B)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2)(a) With the purchase of a South Carolina hunting license and a big game permit, a resident shall be issued three individual antlerless deer tags, two unrestricted individual antlered deer tags, and one antler restriction individual antlered deer tag valid for deer with a minimum of four points on one antler or a minimum twelve-inch inside antler spread. Persons under the age of sixteen, lifetime, and gratis licensees may receive these tags upon request to the department. Residents, including persons under the age of sixteen, lifetime, and gratis licensees also may purchase: (i) two antler restriction individual antlered deer tags valid for deer with a minimum of four points on one antler or a minimum twelve-inch inside antler spread for five dollars per tag; and (ii) additional individual antlerless deer tags for five dollars per tag. (b) Fees for nonresident deer tags are as follows: (i) fifty dollars for the first antlered deer tag and twenty dollars for each additional antlered deer tag up to a maximum of four tags; two of which must be an antler restriction individual antlered deer tag valid only for deer with a minimum of four points on one antler or a minimum twelve-inch inside antler spread; and (ii) ten dollars per individual antlerless deer tag. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect on January 2, 2027. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________